District of Columbia statutes.
1-1405

Organization.

(a)

There are hereby established 3 primary organizational functions in the Office as follows:

(1)

The Office of the Chief Technology Officer, which will include the staff and organizational units needed to carry out the overall plans and directions for the District’s information technology, telecommunications policies, and data centers;

(2)

Agency Support Services, which will provide direct assistance and support to the user agencies throughout the District government. Agency Support Services will also provide procurement and contract oversight and assistance for information technology and telecommunications, maintain standard technology-related contracts that all District departments and agencies may use, and manage projects that introduce new technologies and systems throughout the District government; and

(3)

Technical Services, which will provide support for desktop computers, servers, phones, and network equipment, and identify cost savings, operational efficiencies, and ways to improve public services by introducing tested technologies such as electronic service delivery, document imaging, and Internet systems.

(b)

The Chief Technology Officer, in the performance of his or her duties and functions, is authorized to restructure the organizational components of the Office as he or she deems necessary to improve the quality of services.

History

Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-175, § 1816, 45 DCR 7193
Oct. 19, 2000, D.C. Law 13-172, § 2103(b), 47 DCR 6308

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-1195.5.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 13-172, in par. (1) of subsec. (a), substituted “, telecommunications policies, and data centers” for “and telecommunications policies”.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary addition of §§ 1-1195.1 to 1-1195.5 1981 Ed., see note to § 1-1401.
For temporary (90-day) addition of Chapter 11B 1981 Ed., see notes following § 1-1401.
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 2103(b) of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-376, July 24, 2000, 47 DCR 6574).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2103(b) of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-438, October 20, 2000, 47 DCR 8740).